Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6422.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1238. A school district, an intermediate school district, or a public school academy shall annually notify each of its pupils and a parent or legal guardian of each of its pupils that all pupils may attend a religious instruction class, as described in section 1561(3)(d).